Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-539
Directors; quorum.

A majority of the directors shall constitute a quorum and concurrence of a majority of those in attendance, in any matter within their duties, shall be sufficient for its determination except as otherwise herein provided.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 11, p. 534.